test/src/morphology/N-student_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - студент M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
     студент+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: студент
     студент+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: студента
     студент+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: студента
     студент+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: студенте
     студент+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: студенту
     студент+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: студентом
     студент+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: студенты
     студент+N+Msc+Pl+Acc: студентов
     студент+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: студентов
     студент+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: студентах
     студент+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: студентам
     студент+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: студентами
